California statutes. Water Code
(History: Added by Stats. 1947, Ch. 717.)
-------------------------------------------

23802.

Land may be formed into an improvement district for one or more of the purposes provided for in Chapter 1 of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1947, Ch. 717.)
-------------------------------------------

23803.

The formation of an improvement district under this chapter may be proposed and the petition therefor shall be signed by two-thirds or more in number of the holders of title to the land in the proposed improvement district and the signatures must include those of two-thirds or more in number of the holders of title to the land in the proposed improvement district located outside the district and two-thirds or more in number of the holders of title to the land in the proposed improvement district located in the district if both classes of land are to be included.

(History: Added by Stats. 1947, Ch. 717.)
-------------------------------------------

23804.

Land, in the proposed improvement district, located outside the district shall be described in the petition by each owner, which shall be according to the next preceding equalized county assessment roll.

(History: Added by Stats. 1947, Ch. 717.)
-------------------------------------------

23805.

No assessment shall be levied in the improvement district and no statement thereof prepared, but in lieu thereof the cost of the improvement and the improvement district warrants issued and interest thereon shall be paid from revenue designated by the board in its order forming the improvement district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1947, Ch. 717.)
-------------------------------------------

23806.

The notice provided for in Section 23645 shall also state that the hearing is called to determine the allocation of revenue to pay the costs of the proposed improvement.

(History: Added by Stats. 1947, Ch. 717.)
-------------------------------------------

23807.

Regardless of any findings made by the board if more than one-third in number of the holders of title to land, in the proposed improvement district, located outside the district or more than one-third in number of the holders of title to land, in the proposed improvement district, located inside the district, object at the hearing to its formation or the allocation of revenue made to pay the cost of the proposed improvement, the board shall deny the petition and no further proceedings shall be had on it.

(History: Added by Stats. 1947, Ch. 717.)
-------------------------------------------

23808.

Until the payment or retirement of the warrants for the benefit of which an allocation was made, the allocation shall be irrevocable and the revenue allocated shall be applied solely to the payment of the obligations specified in the allocating order.

(History: Added by Stats. 1947, Ch. 717.)
-------------------------------------------

23809.

Before April 1st of each year after the warrants are issued the board shall fix charges for the use of water in the improvement district sufficient, when added to other allocated revenue that will be received during the current year, to provide funds adequate to pay the amount of the improvement district warrants and interest thereon then due and that will fall due during the current year plus an amount equal to 10 percent more than such amount if the warrants provide that such additional amount shall be charged to establish a reserve fund to further assure payment of the warrants and interest.

(History: Added by Stats. 1947, Ch. 717.)
-------------------------------------------

23810.

Except as provided in Section 23811, the improvement district warrants shall be made payable over not to exceed a period of 10 years and shall specify a rate of interest fixed at the time of their issuance not exceeding 8 percent per year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 130.)
-------------------------------------------

23811.

Upon approval by two-thirds of the board, the improvement district warrants shall be made payable over not to exceed a period of 20 years and shall specify a rate of interest fixed at the time of their issuance not exceeding 8 percent per year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1226, Sec. 31.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Further Assessments and Inclusion [23850. - 23879.]



  ARTICLE 1. Supplemental Assessments [23850. - 23851.]

23850.

If the assessments levied upon land in an improvement district are insufficient to pay the cost of improvements or the warrants issued for the improvements, a supplemental assessment shall be levied upon all of the land in the improvement district sufficient to pay the cost or the warrants.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

23851.

The procedure followed in making the supplemental levy shall be substantially the same as for making the original levy, except that no petition is required.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Assessment for New Purposes [23865. - 23865.]

23865.

Whenever it is desired to do additional work or acquire additional property in or for an improvement district, upon the petition of two-thirds in number of the holders of title to the land in the improvement district an additional assessment may be levied substantially in the same manner as the original assessment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Inclusion of Land [23875. - 23879.]

23875.

If at any time it is desired to include additional land in an improvement district, a petition for inclusion signed by the holders of title to the land to be included may be filed with the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1947, Ch. 536.)
-------------------------------------------

23876.

The inclusion petition shall describe the land in the improvement district as enlarged by the proposed inclusions and give the names and addresses of the owners of the additional land in substantially the same manner as in the original petition for forming an improvement district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

23877.

The same proceedings shall be had on the improvement district inclusion petition as upon the original petition for the formation of an improvement district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

23878.

The board may prescribe any conditions upon the inclusion of the land that it deems just.

(History: Added by Stats. 1947, Ch. 536.)
-------------------------------------------

23879.

If any conditions not contained in the petition for inclusion are prescribed by the board the lands shall not be included until two-thirds in number of the petitioners approve the conditions in writing.

(History: Added by Stats. 1947, Ch. 536.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3.5. Alternative Provisions for the Formation of Improvement Districts and the Issuance of Bonds Therefor [23900. - 23917.]

23900.

This chapter provides an alternative method for the formation of improvement districts for the purpose of cooperating and contracting with the United States and agencies thereof pursuant to the Irrigation District Federal Cooperation Law as contained in Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 23175) of Part 6 of Division 11, or for the purpose of sewage disposal, irrigation water service by a system of pumps, conduits, or both, maintenance of irrigation works, drainage, or distribution of water. The term “district” or “districts” as used in the Irrigation District Federal Cooperation Law shall include improvement districts formed pursuant to the provisions of this chapter. This chapter shall not apply to or affect any other provisions of this division for the formation of improvement districts or the incurring of indebtedness therefor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 35.)
-------------------------------------------

23901.

Improvement districts consisting of a portion of the territory of a district may be formed within a district and, notwithstanding any other provision in this division, bonds of the district may be issued for such improvement districts as provided in this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 580.)
-------------------------------------------

23902.

Bonds of a district for an improvement district may be issued for either the purpose of cooperating and contracting with the United States pursuant to the Irrigation District Federal Cooperation Law as contained in Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 23175) of Part 6 of Division 11, or for any of the other purposes specified in Section 23900.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 35.)
-------------------------------------------

23903.

Whenever the board is of the opinion that an improvement district should be formed for the purpose set forth in this chapter, the board shall adopt a resolution of intention which shall state: (a) the intention of the board to form the proposed improvement district, (b) the purpose for which the proposed improvement district is to be formed, (c) the estimated expense of carrying out the purpose, (d) that assessments for carrying out the purpose shall be levied exclusively upon the lands in the proposed improvement district, (e) that a map showing the exterior boundaries of the proposed improvement district, which map shall govern for all details as to the extent of the proposed improvement district, is on file with the secretary of the district and is available for inspection by any person or persons interested, (f) the time and place for a hearing by the board on the formation of the proposed improvement district, the extent thereof, the purpose for which it is to be formed, the benefit to lands within the proposed improvement district from carrying out such purpose, the estimated expense of carrying out such purpose or any other matter relating to any of the foregoing, and (g) that at the time and place specified any persons interested, including all persons owning lands in the district or in the proposed improvement district, may appear and be heard.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 580.)
-------------------------------------------

23904.

Notice of the hearing shall be given by publishing a copy of the resolution of intention in a newspaper of general circulation published in each affected county, pursuant to Section 6066 of the Government Code, the first publication to be at least fourteen (14) days prior to the time fixed for the hearing. The notice shall also be given by posting a copy of the resolution in three public places within the proposed improvement district for at least fourteen (14) days prior to the time fixed for the hearing. No notice other than that required by this section need be given.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 580.)
-------------------------------------------

23905.

At the time and place so fixed, or at any time or place to which the hearing is continued, the board shall hold the hearing provided for by the resolution of intention, at which hearing any person interested, including all persons owning land in the district, or in the proposed improvement district, may appear and be heard concerning any matters set forth in the resolution of intention or any matters material thereto.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 580.)
-------------------------------------------

23906.

At the hearing the board may adopt a resolution proposing modifications relating to any or all of the following: (a) a modification of the boundaries of the proposed improvement district, (b) the addition to the proposed improvement district of lands which in its opinion will be benefited by carrying out the purpose described in the resolution of intention, (c) the exclusion from the proposed improvement district of any lands described in the resolution of intention which in its opinion will not be benefited by carrying out such purpose or (d) the increasing, decreasing or otherwise modifying of the purpose stated in the resolution of intention. The resolution proposing modification shall describe the proposed modifications, state the change, if any, in the estimated expense of carrying out the purpose, and shall fix a time and place for hearing by the board thereon.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 580.)
-------------------------------------------

23907.

The board shall not order any modifications except after publication of the resolution proposing such modifications once in the same newspaper in which the resolution of intention was published, such publication to be at least fourteen (14) days prior to the date of hearing on the proposed modifications.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 580.)
-------------------------------------------

23908.

The hearing on any proposed modifications, or any continuance thereof, may be held at the same time and place as any continued hearing on the resolution of intention and both hearings may be held and conducted concurrently.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 580.)
-------------------------------------------

23909.

At the conclusion of the hearing on the resolution of intention and of the hearing, if any, upon proposed modifications, the board may by resolution order the improvement district formed for the purpose and with the exterior boundaries described in the resolution of intention, or for the purpose and with the exterior boundaries as proposed to be modified in the resolution, if any, proposing modifications. The resolution ordering the district formed shall state the estimated expense of carrying out the purpose described therein. The resolution shall also number and designate the improvement district substantially as “Improvement District No. ____ of ____ District.”

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 580.)
-------------------------------------------

23910.

After adopting the resolution ordering the improvement district formed, the board may provide for and call a special bond election within such improvement district to submit to the voters of the improvement district a proposition of whether or not an indebtedness of the district shall be incurred and bonds issued therefor in an amount not exceeding the estimate stated in the resolution ordering the improvement district formed, such indebtedness and bonds to be payable from assessments to be levied and collected upon lands within the improvement district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 580.)
-------------------------------------------

23911.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, special bond elections within an improvement district shall be called, noticed, held, conducted and the results thereof canvassed in substantially the same manner as is provided in this division for general obligation bond elections held in the entire district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 580.)
-------------------------------------------

23912.

If two-thirds of the votes cast upon the proposition at a special bond election held in an improvement district are in favor of the issuance of the bonds of the district for the improvement district, the board may by resolution, at such time or times as it deems proper, provide for the issuance of all or any part of such bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 580.)
-------------------------------------------

23913.

Bonds of the district for the improvement district shall be issued and sold in substantially the same manner and upon the same terms and conditions as general obligation bonds of the entire district, except that assessments for the payment of the bonds and the interest thereon shall be levied and collected from annual assessments to be levied upon and collected from lands within the improvement district. The bonds shall be issued in the name of the district and shall be designated “Bonds of ________ District for Improvement District No. ___” and each bond and all interest coupons shall state that the assessment for the payment thereof shall be limited to annual assessments to be levied upon and collected from the lands within the improvement district, except to the extent that provision for such payment has been made by the board, as may be permitted by law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 580.)
-------------------------------------------

23914.

Except to the extent that provision has otherwise been made by the board, as may be permitted by law, for the payment of the principal of and interest upon bonds of the district for the improvement district as they become due and also for the payment of the operating expenses of such improvement district, the annual estimate made by the board of the sum required by the district to discharge all of its obligations shall, in addition to the other amounts required to be included therein, include an amount sufficient to pay the principal of bonds of the district for such improvement district and the interest thereon as the same becomes due and also to pay operating expenses for the improvement district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 580.)
-------------------------------------------

23915.

In addition to the charges authorized to be fixed and collected pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 22280) Chapter 2, Part 5 of this division, the board in lieu, in whole or in part, of raising money for the payment of the principal of and interest on bonds of the district issued for an improvement district or for the operating expenses of the improvement district, may fix and collect charges for the making of water available to the holders of title to land in the improvement district or the occupants thereon. Such additional charges within an improvement district shall be fixed and collected in substantially the same manner and upon the same terms and conditions as is provided in Article 3 (commencing with Section 22280), Chapter 2, Part 5 of this division for charges to be fixed and collected within the entire district, except that such additional charges fixed and collected from an improvement district shall be expended only for the payment of the principal of and interest upon bonds of the district issued for the improvement district or for payment of the operating expenses of the improvement district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 580.)
-------------------------------------------

23916.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, the provisions of this division applicable to general obligation bonds of the district and assessments therefor shall, so far as consistent with this chapter, apply to general obligation bonds of the district for improvement districts therein.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 580.)
-------------------------------------------

23917.

The treasurer shall establish a separate fund for general obligation bonds of the district for each improvement district to which shall be apportioned money properly belonging to such general obligation bond fund. The money in any separate general obligation bond fund shall be used for the payment of bonds of the district for the particular improvement district and interest thereon and until the bonded indebtedness of the district therefor is discharged shall not be used for any other purpose.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 580.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Functioning of Improvement Districts [23950. - 24021.]



  ARTICLE 1. Improvement District Management [23950. - 23956.]

23950.

In a district containing an improvement district the board and all of the officers of the district each respectively has all the rights, powers, and privileges as to the improvement district, its land, and the proceedings in relation to the improvement district that each respectively has for the district of which the improvement district is a part, including the right of the district to acquire, own, and hold property.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

23951.

The board may also hold property used or acquired in connection with the improvement in the name of the directors and their successors in office as trustees for the improvement district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

23952.

The board of a district in which an improvement district exists may allow on terms that may be agreed upon any person to carry water through any conduit for the improvement of which the improvement district was formed and may cancel the right in the event that payments are not made in accordance with the agreed terms.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

23953.

The work of improvement provided for in this part and the purchase of all supplies, material, and equipment therefor shall be performed by the district, or in the discretion of the board contracts may be made for the work and material after notice calling for bids, as prescribed by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

23954.

The board of the district may in lieu in whole or in part of levying assessments for the operation of improvement district works fix and collect charges for the use of water or for any other service furnished by means of the improvement district works in the same manner and with the same effect as charges are made and collected by districts for the use of water or for services.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

23955.

The board of the district may, provide for the maintenance and operation of the works of an improvement district from the funds of the irrigation district, in lieu of levying further improvement district assessments for such purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1945, Ch. 301.)
-------------------------------------------

23956.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this code, the board of a district in which an improvement district exists may establish facilities use charges for the use of irrigation facilities in such improvement district and, in establishing such charges, may provide that water shall be furnished or delivered through such facilities only to lands in such improvement district in respect of which such facilities use charges or annual installments thereof, fixed as provided in this section, shall have been paid in advance. Such facilities use charges shall be in amounts equal to the respective amounts of the assessments theretofore levied against the lands in such improvement district for the purpose of providing such facilities. In establishing such charges the board of the district shall provide (a) that payment in full of any such assessment shall constitute payment in advance in full of such facilities use charge; (b) that all facilities use charges not so paid in advance in full shall be payable in annual installments, each such annual installment to be equal in amount to (i) the annual installment of the unpaid assessment theretofore levied against the land in respect of which such charge is payable and due on or before the next succeeding November 20th plus interest thereon at the rate provided in the order levying such assessment plus 10 percent in addition (added for anticipated delinquencies), plus (ii) all delinquent annual installments, if any, of such unpaid assessment together with penalties and interest at said rate on such delinquent installments; and (c) that payment of any annual installment of any such facilities use charge shall constitute payment in full of the annual installment of such unpaid assessment due on or before the next succeeding November 20th and of all delinquent annual installments, if any, of such unpaid assessment. Any proceedings heretofore taken by the board of any district to establish the facilities use charges authorized by this section are hereby confirmed, validated and declared legally effective.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 137.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Improvement District Warrants [23975. - 23981.]

23975.

A district may issue improvement district warrants signed by its president and secretary in face amount not exceeding in the aggregate the cost of the improvements exclusive of interest and amounts paid prior to the issuance of these warrants on the assessment levied to pay for the improvement.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

23976.

Improvement district warrants shall be made payable in amounts and at the times corresponding substantially to the amounts and times of payment of the installments of the improvement district assessment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

23977.

Improvement district warrants shall bear interest at the rate fixed at the time of the levy of the improvement district assessment, and the interest may be made payable semiannually.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

23978.

Coupons for the interest on these warrants may be attached to them.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

23979.

Improvement district warrants may be made payable to any of the following:

(a) Bearer.

(b) Persons furnishing work, labor, or material.

(c) The contractor if the work of improvement is to be done under contract.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

23980.

Improvement district warrants may be sold by the district for not less than par at either public or private sale.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

23981.

Any surplus funds and any money held by a district in a sinking or depreciation fund may in the discretion of its board be invested in the warrants of any improvement district within the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1947, Ch. 536.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Advance Payment of Assessments [24000. - 24004.]

24000.

At any time before improvement district warrants are issued, the amount of any improvement district assessment on any land, exclusive of interest and the 10 per cent added for anticipated delinquencies, may be paid in money.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

24001.

Land on which the amount of the improvement district assessment has been paid pursuant to Section 24000 shall not be subject to the annual installments of the assessments levied for the purposes of the improvement, but it shall be and remain liable for any assessments levied for operation and for any supplemental or additional improvement district assessments levied.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

24002.

Any landowner of an improvement district who desires at any time to lessen or remove the lien upon his land of any improvement district assessment may deliver to the district treasurer funds for cancellation of warrants or any other obligation payable out of the assessment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 505.)
-------------------------------------------

24003.

Land upon which the assessment for improvement district warrants, including any interest, or for any other obligation payable out of the assessment, has been paid pursuant to Section 24002 shall not be subject to further assessments levied for the purposes of the improvement, but it shall remain liable for any assessments levied for operation and for any supplemental or additional improvement district assessments levied.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 505.)
-------------------------------------------

24004.

The treasurer shall inform the landowner or any authorized person proposing to lessen or remove the lien of an improvement district assessment upon a piece of land of the amount of principal and interest due and to become due on warrants and the amount of any other indebtedness payable out of the improvement district assessment. Upon receipt of funds the treasurer shall take such action as is necessary to clear the specified land of all or the appropriate portion of the lien created by the improvement district assessment.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 505.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Actions and Proceedings [24020. - 24021.]

24020.

All acts, proceedings, conclusions, and findings of fact, including the levy of an assessment, by a board of a district concerning an improvement district therein shall be conclusive except in an action or proceeding instituted within six months after the acts, proceedings, conclusions, or findings were had or made.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

24021.

An action to determine the validity of an assessment or of warrants may be brought pursuant to Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 860) of Title 10 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1541.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Dissolution of Improvement Districts [24100. - 24103.]

24100.

At any time prior to the incurring of any indebtedness or upon the full payment of all indebtedness of an improvement district, the board may by resolution set a time for a hearing on whether or not to dissolve the improvement district or a petition, signed and acknowledged by not less than the number of holders of title to land constituting the improvement district required to sign a petition to form the improvement district, may be filed with the board requesting that the improvement district be dissolved.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 18.)
-------------------------------------------

24101.

A hearing on dissolution shall be had in the same manner and after the same notice as is required for the formation of an improvement district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

24102.

The board may, after the hearing, order the improvement district dissolved.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

24102.5.

In any case in which the board has by resolution determined that all indebtedness of the improvement district has been paid and the improvement for which the improvement district was formed no longer exists or is no longer operational, the board may order the improvement district dissolved without a hearing.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 628.)
-------------------------------------------

24103.

The order of dissolution shall be recorded in the same manner as the order forming the improvement district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 8. FINANCIAL ORGANIZATION [24250. - 24771.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Financial Provisions [24250. - 24275.]



  ARTICLE 1. Creation of Liabilities [24250. - 24253.]

24250.

A district may not incur any debt or liability whatever in excess of the express provisions of this division. Any debt or liability so incurred is absolutely void.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

24251.

For the purposes of formation or for any other of its purposes a district may, before the levying of the first assessment, incur indebtedness in a total amount not to exceed two thousand dollars, ($2,000) or, if the district contains more than 4,000 acres, one-half as many dollars as there are acres of land in the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

24252.

A district shall have the right to enter into any contract or lease for any property necessary in the judgment of its board for any of the uses or purposes of the district and by the lease or contract to bind the district for the payment of the consideration specified in the lease or contract as may be provided therein.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1947, Ch. 965.)
-------------------------------------------

24252.1.

A district may enter into any forward contract, or futures contract, or put, call, or swap agreement, or similar procurement method for electricity, natural gas, or coal, or any weather, fuel, or energy risk management contract determined to be in the best interests of the district by the board of directors of the district for any of the uses or purposes of the district and by those contracts or agreements to bind the district for the payment of the consideration specified therein.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 846, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

24253.

A district may contract with any state agency to finance any district improvement authorized by this division that is related to the provision of water for human consumption. The terms of the contract shall be consistent with this division. Notwithstanding any other provision in this division, the term of the contract may extend up to 30 years.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 606, Sec. 10.   Effective October 9, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Settlements and Statements [24270. - 24275.]

24270.

On the first Monday in each month the collector shall do all of the following:

(a) Settle with the secretary for all money collected for assessments during the month next preceding.

(b) Pay the money to the treasurer.

(c) File in the district office with the secretary the receipt of the treasurer for the money paid.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

24271.

The collector shall be credited in his settlement with both:

(a) The amount due to the district on property he sells to the district for delinquent assessments.

(b) The amount by which any assessment is canceled or modified by order of the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

24272.

Within six days after he settles with the secretary, the collector shall file in the district office with the secretary a statement under oath, showing:

(a) An account of all his transactions and receipts during the period for which the settlement was made.

(b) Payment to the treasurer of all money collected by him as collector during the period for which the settlement was made except redemption money held for assignees of certificates of sale.

(c) The respective sums of redemption money held by him for assignees of certificates of sale and the names of the persons entitled to receive this money if known to him.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

24273.

The treasurer shall not later than the third Monday in each month file in the district office with the secretary a verified written report to the board showing all of the following:

(a) The amount of money in the district treasury at the close of the month next preceding.

(b) The amount of receipts for the month next preceding.

(c) The amount and items of expenditures for the month next preceding.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 133.)
-------------------------------------------

24274.

The board, on or before its regular monthly meeting in the fourth month of its fiscal year, shall render a verified statement of the financial condition of the district showing particularly all of the following:

(a) Revenues of the next preceding year and their sources: amounts received (cash basis) or amounts received and receivable which increase the equity of the governmental unit (accrual basis).

(b) Expenditures of the next preceding year and their purposes: amounts paid (cash basis) or amounts paid and payable which decrease the equity of the governmental unit (accrual basis).

(c) The accounting method used (cash or accrual basis).

(d) A statement of the accounting method used for the preceding accounting period.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 771, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

24275.

Notification that the annual financial statement is available for inspection and review shall be made at least once a week for two weeks in a newspaper published in the county in which the principal office of the district is located.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 771, Sec. 6.5.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Deposits [24350. - 24393.]



  ARTICLE 1. Deposits Generally [24350. - 24352.]

24350.

Any money belonging to a district may be deposited by the officer of the district who has legal custody of the money, in accordance with the general laws governing the deposit of public money.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

24351.

Where the deposit of money is insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation no additional security need be required from the bank for the portion of the district’s deposits so insured.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

24352.

Where arrangements have been made by the district with the Reconstruction Finance Corporation for deposit of district funds in the Federal Reserve Bank of the United States, such deposits may be made in that bank or any branch of it without requiring any security or interest.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Deposits in County Treasury [24370. - 24373.]

24370.

The board may draw from time to time from the construction fund and deposit in the county treasury of the office county any money in the construction fund in excess of twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000).

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

24371.

The county treasurer shall receive and receipt for district money deposited with him and place it to the credit of the district, and he shall be responsible upon his official bond for the safe-keeping and disbursing of the money.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

24372.

The county treasurer shall pay out district money or any portion of it only to the treasurer of the district and only upon the order of the board signed by the president and attested by the secretary.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

24373.

A county treasurer having charge of district money shall report as to it in writing on the second Monday in each month all of the following:

(a) Amount in the county treasury at the close of the month next preceding.

(b) Amounts received in the month next preceding.

(c) Amounts paid out in the month next preceding.

The report shall be verified and filed with the secretary.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Special Accounts [24390. - 24393.]

24390.

The board may by resolution establish special accounts from the general fund when they are convenient for the efficient and economical operation of the district and designate the person or officer to have custody of the several accounts so established.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

24391.

Special accounts from the general fund shall severally be supplied from the general fund by warrant in the same manner as in the payment of any claim against the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

24392.
